enhuadj2.foma
         §oeoez24§ -> o // [ r | R ] o z s FirstHat _ .o. # koszt
         §oeoez24§ -> 0 // [ s z | z s | S z | Z s ] FirstHat _ ; # koszt de kekszet
define HarmRuleAccoamely34o §oeoez34§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez34§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez34§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez34§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y ]  FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez34§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z s ] AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez34§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
# if at least one additional affix befor the acc affix babot de babjaimat
         §oeoez34§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez34§ -> o // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* FirstHat [ \"^" ]* _ ,,
         §oeoez34§ -> o // [ r | R ] o z s FirstHat _ .o. # koszt
         §oeoez34§ -> 0 // [ s z | z s ] FirstHat _ ; # koszt de kekszet
define HarmRuleAccoe §oeoez4§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy s z %^ _ .o. 
         §oeoez4§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ f | F ] ü l FirstHat _\"^"* .#. .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ t | T ] e j FirstHat _\"^"* .#. .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ m | M ] e l l FirstHat _\"^"* .#. .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y  ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z s ] AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
# if at least one additional affix befor the acc affix babot de babjaimat
         §oeoez4§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez4§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat [ \"^" ]* _ ,,
         §oeoez4§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAccoea §oeoez4a§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy s z %^ _ .o. 
         §oeoez4a§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ f | F ] ü l FirstHat _\"^"* .#. .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ t | T ] e j FirstHat _\"^"* .#. .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ m | M ] e l l FirstHat _\"^"* .#. .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y ]  FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z s ] AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
# if at least one additional affix befor the acc affix babot de babjaimat
         §oeoez4a§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez4a§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat [ \"^" ]* _ ,,
         §oeoez4a§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
#másik
define HarmRuleAccmelymasik §oeoez26§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez26§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez26§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez26§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez26§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z s ] AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez26§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
# if at least one additional affix befor the acc affix babot de babjaimat
         §oeoez26§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez26§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Vowel \Vowel* FirstHat [ \"^" ]* _ ,,
         §oeoez26§ -> a // [ r | R ] o z s FirstHat _ .o. # koszt
         §oeoez26§ -> 0 // [ s z | z s | S z | Z s ] FirstHat _ ; # koszt
#
# göb, etc...
#
define HarmRuleAcc1 §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y  ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z s ] AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // s z FirstHat _ .o. # koszt
# if at least one additional affix befor the acc affix babot de babjaimat
         §oeoez3§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat [ \"^" ]* _ ,,
         §oeoez3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAcc1mely §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y  ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z s | S z | Z s ] AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> 0 // [ s | S ] z %^ _ .o. # koszt
         §oeoez3§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez3§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat [ \"^" ]* _ ,,
         §oeoez3§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez3§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleAccUeoe §oeoez23§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> 0 // Vowel AccSingle AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y  ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | l y | s z | z s ] AccSingle FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> 0 // [ s z | z s ] FirstHat _ .o. # koszt
# if at least one additional affix befor the acc affix babot de babjaimat
         §oeoez23§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat [ \"^" ]* _ ,,
# if at least one additional affix befor the acc affix tükröt tükröket
         §oeoez23§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* [ "^" ] ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez23§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleAccoaee §oeoez42§ -> 0 // Vowelwithy FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez42§ -> 0 // Vowel [ n y | s z | l y  ] FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez42§ -> 0 // [ Nodupy ] y FirstHat _ .o.
         §oeoez42§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez42§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez42§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlur §oeoez1§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez1§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlure §oeoez1e§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez1e§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1e§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1e§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePluroe1oe §oeoez1oe§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez1oe§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1oe§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1oe§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlury §oeoez1y§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithyy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez1y§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1y§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1y§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlurmagas §oeoez1magas§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* [ Vowel | Cons y] FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez1magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez1magas§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePluroa §oeoez11§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez11§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez11§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez11§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePluroae §oeoez11e§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez11e§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez11e§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez11e§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePluroaoe §oeoez15§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez15§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez15§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez15§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
define HarmRulePlurUeoe §oeoez16§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy FirstHat ?* _ .o.
         §oeoez16§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons+ FirstHat ?* _ ,,
         §oeoez16§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel Cons+ FirstHat ?* _ ;
